Utah statutes.
62A-17-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "211" means the abbreviated dialing code assigned by the Federal Communications Commission for consumer access to community information and referral services.

(2)  "Approved 211 service provider" means a public or nonprofit agency or organization designated by the department to provide 211 services.

(3) (a)  "Utah 211" means an information and referral system that:

(i)  maintains a database of:

(A)  providers of health and human services; and

(B)  volunteer opportunities and coordinators throughout the state;

(ii)  assists individuals, families, and communities at no cost in identifying, understanding, and accessing the providers of health and human services; and

(iii)  works collaboratively with state agencies, local governments, community-based organizations, not-for-profit organizations, organizations active in disaster relief, and faith-based organizations.

(b)  "Utah 211" does not mean service provided by 911 and first responders.



Enacted by Chapter 24, 2013 General Session

